dictsource/he_rules
.group ד
    ד   (L10   d
    ד   (_    =d
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ד   (_    d
 L94) ד   (_    d
    דַ   (L10   da
    דַ   (_    da
    דָּ   (L61   do
    דָּ   (L10   da
    דָּ   (_    da
    דַּ   (L10   da
    דַּ   (_    da
    דֵ   (L10   de
    דֵ   (_    de
    דֶ   (L10   de
    דֶ   (_    de
 L56) דֶ   (L42_  =de
    דֶּ   (L10   de
    דֶּ   (_    de
 L56) דֶּ   (L42_  =de
    דֵּ   (L10   de
    דֵּ   (_    de
    דְ   (L10   d
    דְ   (_    d
    דְּ   (L10   d
    דְּ   (_    d
    דִ   (L10   di
    דִ   (_    di
    דִּ   (L10   di
    דִּ   (_    di
    די   (L10   di
    די   (_    di
    דֹּ   (L10   do
    דֹּ   (_    do
    דֹ   (L10   do
    דֹ   (_    do
    דֻ   (L10   du
    דֻ   (_    du
    דֻּ   (L10   du
    דֻּ   (_    du
    דׇ   (L10   do
    דׇ   (_    do
    דׇּ   (L10   do
    דׇּ   (_    do
    דָ   (L61   do
    דֳ   (L10   do
    דֳ   (_   do
    דֳּ   (L10   do
    דֳּ   (_   do
    דֳ'   (L10   Do
    דֳ'   (_   Do
    דָ   (L10   da
    דָ   (_    da
    דּ   (L10   d
    דּ   (_    =d
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) דּ   (_    d
 L94) דּ   (_    d
    דּוֹ   (_    d'o
    ד'   (L10   D
    ד'   (_    =D
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ד'   (_    D
 L94) ד'   (_    D
    דַ'   (L10   Da
    דַ'   (_    Da
    דַּ'   (L10   Da
    דַּ'   (_    Da
    דֵ'   (L10   De
    דֵ'   (_    De
    דֶ'   (L10   De
    דֶ'   (_    De
 L56) דֶ'   (L42_  =De
    דֶּ'   (L10   De
    דֶּ'   (_    De
 L56) דֶּ'   (L42_  =De
    דְ'   (L10   D
    דְ'   (_    D
    ד'י   (L10   Di
    ד'י   (_    Di
    דׇ'   (L10   Do
    דׇ'   (_    Do
    דׇּ'   (L10   Do
    דׇּ'   (_    Do
    דָ'   (L61   Do
    דָ'   (L10   Da
    דָ'   (_    Da
 _) דְ   (L11   de
 _) דְּ   (L11   de
 _) דְ'   (L11   De
    דְ   (L42   de
    דְּ   (L42   de
    דְ   (L24   de
    דְּ   (L24   de
    דְ'   (L24   De
 L55) דְ   (L10   de
 L55) דְּ   (L10   de
 L55) דְ'   (L10   De
 _L13) דְ   (L10   d
 _L13) דְּ   (L10   d
 _L13) דְ'   (L10   D

.group ה
    ה   (L10   h
 // hataya - הִפְעִילָה
 _L68L13L65L30L64) ה   (_
 // hataya - תִּפְעַלְנָה
 _L80L13L66L13L76) ה   (_
 // hataya - תְּסֻפַּרְנָה
 _L83L81L66L13L76) ה   (_
 // hataya - תְּסוּפַּרְנָה
 _L83L82L66L13L76) ה   (_
 // hataya - תִּתְפַּעֵלְנָה
 _L80L84L66L85L13L76) ה   (_
 // hataya - הִתְפַּעֵלְנָה
 _L68L84L66L85L13L76) ה   (_
    ה   (_  =
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ה   (_
 L94L94) ה   (_
 _) הַ   (L15L60P2   ha
 _) הַ   (L18L20P2   ha
    הַ   (L10   ha
    הַ   (_    ha
    הֲ   (L10   ha
    הֲ   (_    ha
    הַּ   (L10   ha
    הַּ   (_    ha
    הָּ   (L61   ho
    הָּ   (L10   ha
    הָּ   (_    ha
    הֳ   (L10   ho
    הֳ   (_    ho
    הֵ   (L10   he
    הֵ   (_    he
    הֶ   (L10   he
    הֶ   (_    he
 L56) הֶ   (L42_  =he
    הֱ   (L10   he
    הֱ   (_    he
    הְ   (L10   h
    הְ   (_    h
 _) הִ   (L10   hi
    הִ   (L10   hi
    הִ   (_    hi
    הי   (L10   hi
    הי   (_    hi
    הֻ   (L10   hu
    הֻ   (_    hu
    הֹ   (L10   ho
    הֹ   (_    ho
    הֹּ   (L10   ho
    הֹּ   (_    ho
    הׇ   (L10   ho
    הׇ   (_    ho
    הׇּ   (L10   ho
    הׇּ   (_    ho
 _) הָ   (L17L20P2   ha
    הָ   (L61+   ho
    הָ   (L10   ha
    הָ   (_    ha
    הּ   (L10   h
    הּ   (_    =
 _) הְ   (L11   he
    הְ   (L25   he
 L55) הְ   (L10   he
 _L13) הְ   (L10   h

.group ו
    ו   (L26+
    ו   (L10   v
    ו   (_    =v
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ו   (_    v
 L94) ו   (_    v
    וְ   (L10   v
    וְ   (_    v
 _) וַ   (L62P2   va
    וַ   (L10   va
    וַ   (_    va
    וַּ   (L10   va
    וַּ   (_    va
    וָ   (L61   vo
 _) וָ   (L61P2   va
    וָ   (L10   va
    וָ   (_    va
    וָו   (L10   va
    וָו   (_    va
    וָּ   (L61   vo
    וֳ   (L10   vo
    וֳ   (_   vo
    וָּ   (L10   va
    וָּ   (_    va
    וֵּ   (L10   ve
    וֵּ   (_    ve
    וֵּו   (L10   ve
    וֵּו   (_    ve
    וֶּ   (L10   ve
    וֶּ   (_    ve
 L56) וֶּ   (L42_  =ve
    וֶּו   (L10   ve
    וֶּו   (_    ve
 L56) וֶּו   (L42_  =ve
    וֵ   (L10   ve
    וֵ   (_    ve
    וֵו   (L10   ve
    וֵו   (_    ve
 _) וֶ   (L63P2   ve
    וֶ   (L10   ve
    וֶ   (_    ve
 L56) וֶ   (L42_  =ve
    וִ   (L10   vi
    וִ   (_    vi
    וִּ   (L10   vi
    וִּ   (_    vi
 _) וִי   (L10P3   vi
 _) וּ   (L13P2   u
 _) וּ   (L19P2   u
    וּ   (L10   u
 // hataya - נִפְעַלְנוּ
 _L74L13L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - הִפְעַלְנוּ
 _L68L13L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - הֻפְעַלְנוּ
 _L72L13L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - הִפְעִילוּ
 _L68L13L65L30L67) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - תַּפְעִילוּ
 _L70L13L65L30L67) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - יַפְעִילוּ
 _L71L13L65L30L67) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - פָּעַלְנוּ
 _L64L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - יָכֹלְנוּ
 _L64L77L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - יָכוֹלְנוּ
 _L64L79L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - פִּעַלְנוּ
 _L65L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - פִּיעַלְנוּ
 _L65L30L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - סֻפַּרְנוּ
 _L81L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - סוּפַּרְנוּ
 _L82L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - הִתְפַּעַלְנוּ
 _L68L13L66L66L13L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - קַטַּלְתֵּנוּ
 _L66L66L13L87L34) וּ   (_    =u
 // hataya - קַטָּלוֹתֵינוּ
 _L66L64L79L91L30L34) וּ   (_    =u
    וּ   (_    'u
    וְּ   (L10   vu
    וְּ   (_    vu
    וֻ   (L10   vu
    וֻ   (_    vu
    וֻּ   (L10   vu
    וֻּ   (_    vu
    ווְּ  (L10   v
    ווְּ   (_    v
    וּוּ  (L10   vu
    וּוּ   (_    vu
    וּוֹ  (L10   vo
    וּוֹ   (_    vo
    וִו   (L10   vi
    וִו   (_    vi
    וַו   (L10   va
    וַו   (_    va
    ווֹ   (L10   vo
    ווֹ   (_   vo
    וֹ   (L10   o
    וֹ   (_    'o
    וָוא   (L10   wa
    וָוא   (_    wa
    וַוא   (L10   wa
    וַוא   (_    wa
    וִוי   (L10   wi
    וִוי   (_    wi
    וְיי   (L10   vej
    וְיי   (_    vej
    וּואטְ   (L10   wat
    וּואטְ   (_    wat
    ום   (L10   'um
    ום   (_    'um
 _) וְ   (L10   ve
    וְ   (L26   ve
 L55) וְ   (L10   ve
 _L13) וְ   (L10   v

.group ז
    ז   (L10   z
    ז   (_    =z
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ז   (_    z
 L94) ז   (_    z
    זְּ   (L10   z
    זְּ   (_    z
    זּ   (L10   z
    זּ   (_    =z
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) זּ   (_    z
 L94) זּ   (_    z
    זַ   (L10   za
    זַ   (_    za
    זָּ   (L61   zo
    זָּ   (L10   za
    זָּ   (_    za
    זַּ   (L10   za
    זַּ   (_    za
    זֵ   (L10   ze
    זֵ   (_    ze
    זֵּ   (L10   ze
    זֵּ   (_    ze
    זֶ   (L10   ze
    זֶ   (_    ze
 L56) זֶ   (L42_  =ze
    זֶּ   (L10   ze
    זֶּ   (_    ze
 L56) זֶּ   (L42_  =ze
    זְ   (L10   z
    זְ   (_    z
    זִ   (L10   zi
    זִ   (_    zi
    זִּ   (L10   zi
    זִּ   (_    zi
    זי   (L10   zi
    זי   (_    zi
    זׇ   (L10   zo
    זׇ   (_    zo
    זׇּ   (L10   zo
    זׇּ   (_    zo
    זֹ   (L10   zo
    זֹ   (_    zo
    זֹּ   (L10   zo
    זֹּ   (_    zo
    זָ   (L61   zo
    זֳּ   (L10   zo
    זֳּ   (_   zo
    זֳ   (L10   zo
    זֳ   (_   zo
    זֳ'   (L10   Zo
    זֳ'   (_   Zo
    זֳּ'   (L10   Zo
    זֳּ'   (_   Zo
    זֻּ   (L10   zu
    זֻּ   (_   zu
    זֻ   (L10   zu
    זֻ   (_   zu
    זֻ'   (L10   Zu
    זֻ'   (_   Zu
    זֻּ'   (L10   Zu
    זֻּ'   (_   Zu
    זָ   (L10   za
    זָ   (_    za
    ז'   (L10   Z
    ז'   (_    =Z
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ז'   (_    Z
 L94) ז'   (_    Z
    זַ'   (L10   Za
    זַ'   (_    Za
    זֵ'   (L10   Ze
    זֵ'   (_    Ze
    זֶ'   (L10   Ze
    זֶ'   (_    Ze
 L56) זֶ'   (L42_  =Ze
    זְ'   (L10   Z
    זְ'   (_    Z
    זִ'   (L10   Zi
    זִ'   (_    Zi
    ז'י   (L10   Zi
    ז'י   (_    Zi
    זׇ'   (L10   Zo
    זׇ'   (_    Zo
    זָ'   (L61   Zo
    זָ'   (L10   Za
    זָ'   (_    Za
    זּ'   (L10   Z
    זּ'   (_    =Z
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) זּ'   (_    Z
 L94) זּ'   (_    Z
    זַּ'   (L10   Za
    זַּ'   (_    Za
    זֵּ'   (L10   Ze
    זֵּ'   (_    Ze
    זֶּ'   (L10   Ze
    זֶּ'   (_    Ze
 L56) זֶּ'   (L42_  =Ze
    זְּ'   (L10   Z
    זְּ'   (_    Z
    זִּ'   (L10   Zi
    זִּ'   (_    Zi
    זּ'י   (L10   Zi
    זּ'י   (_    Zi
    זׇּ'   (L10   Zo
    זׇּ'   (_    Zo
    זָּ'   (L61   Zo
    זָּ'   (L10   Za
    זָּ'   (_    Za
 _) זְּ   (L11   ze
 _) זְ   (L11   ze
 _) זְ'   (L11   Ze
 _) זְּ'   (L11   Ze
    זְּ   (L27   ze
    זְ   (L27   ze
    זְ'   (L27   Ze
    זְּ'   (L27   Ze
 L55) זְּ   (L10   ze
 L55) זְ   (L10   ze
 L55) זְ'   (L10   Ze
 L55) זְּ'   (L10   Ze
 _L13) זְּ   (L10   z
 _L13) זְ   (L10   z
 _L13) זְ'   (L10   Z
 _L13) זְּ'   (L10   Z


.group ח
    ח   (L10   X
    ח   (_    =X
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ח   (_    X
 L94) ח   (_    X
    חַ   (L10   Xa
    חַ   (_    aX
    חֵ   (L10   Xe
    חֵ   (_    Xe
    חֶ   (L10   Xe
    חֶ   (_    Xe
 L56) חֶ   (L42_  =Xe
    חֱ   (L10   Xe
    חֱ   (_    Xe
    חְ   (L10   X
    חְ   (_    X
    חִ   (L10   Xi
    חִ   (_    Xi
    חֹ   (L10   Xo
    חֹ   (_    Xo
    חי   (L10   Xi
    חי   (_    Xi
    חׇ   (L10   Xo
    חׇ   (_    Xo
    חׇּ   (L10   Xo
    חׇּ   (_    Xo
    חָ   (L61   Xo
    חָ   (L10   Xa
    חָ   (_    Xa
    חֳ   (L10   Xo
    חֳ   (_    Xo
    חֲ   (L10   Xa
    חֲ   (_    Xa
 _) חְ   (L11   Xe
    חְ   (L28   Xe
    חְ   (L31L20   Xe
 L55) חְ   (L10   Xe
    חֳ   (L10   Xo
    חֳ   (_   Xo
    חֻ   (L10   Xu
    חֻ   (_   Xu
 _L13) חְ   (L10   X

.group ט
    ט   (L10   t
    ט   (_    =t
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) ט   (_    t
 L94) ט   (_    t
    טּ   (L10   t
    טּ   (_    =t
 // hataya - קַטַל
 L06L66) טּ   (_    t
 L94) טּ   (_    t
    טְּ   (L10   t
    טְּ   (_    t
    טַ   (L10   ta
    טַ   (_    ta
    טַּ   (L10   ta
    טַּ   (_    ta
    טָּ   (L61   to
    טָּ   (L10   ta
    טָּ   (_    ta
    טֵ   (L10   te
    טֵ   (_    te
    טֶ   (L10   te
    טֶ   (_    te
 L56) טֶ   (L42_  =te
    טֶּ   (L10   te
    טֶּ   (_    te
 L56) טֶּ   (L42_  =te
    טֵּ   (L10   te
    טֵּ   (_    te
    טְ   (L10   t
    טְ   (_    t
    טִ   (L10   ti
    טִ   (_    ti
    טִּ   (L10   ti
    טִּ   (_    ti
    טֹ   (L10   to
    טֹ   (_    to
    טֹּ   (L10   to
    טֹּ   (_    to
    טי   (L10   ti
    טי   (_    ti
    טָ   (L61   to
    טָ   (L10   ta
    טָ   (_    ta
 _) טְּ   (L11   te
 _) טְ   (L11   te
    טְּ   (L29   te
    טְ   (L29   te
    טְּ   (L38   te
    טְ   (L38   te
    טְּ   (L42   te
    טְ   (L42   te
 L55) טְּ   (L10   te
 L55) טְ   (L10   te
    טֳּ   (L10   to
    טֳּ   (_   to
    טֳ   (L10   to
    טֳ   (_   to
    טֻּ   (L10   tu
    טֻּ   (_   tu
    טֻ   (L10   tu
    טֻ   (_   tu
 _L13) טְּ   (L10   t
 _L13) טְ   (L10   t
